lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX T Y 537
SFX T i       0               ti
SFX T ti      davau           ti
SFX T ti      davai           ti
SFX T ti      davo            ti
SFX T ti      davome          ti
SFX T ti      davom           ti
SFX T ti      davote          ti
SFX T ti      davot           ti
SFX T ti      siu             [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      iu              [sð]ti
SFX T zti     siu             zti
SFX T þti     ðiu             þti
SFX T ti      si              [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      i               [sð]ti
SFX T zti     si              zti
SFX T þti     ði              þti
SFX T ti      s               [^sðzþûy]ti
SFX T ti      0               [sð]ti
SFX T zti     s               zti
SFX T þti     ð               þti
SFX T ti      sime            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sim             [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ime             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      im              [sð]ti
SFX T zti     sime            zti
SFX T zti     sim             zti
SFX T þti     ðime            þti
SFX T þti     ðim             þti
SFX T ti      site            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sit             [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ite             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      it              [sð]ti
SFX T zti     site            zti
SFX T zti     sit             zti
SFX T þti     ðite            þti
SFX T þti     ðit             þti
SFX T ti      èiau            ti
SFX T i       umei            ti
SFX T i       um              ti
SFX T i       ø               ti
SFX T i       umëme           ti
SFX T i       umëm            ti
SFX T i       ume             ti
SFX T i       umëte           ti
SFX T i       umët            ti
SFX T i       ute             ti
SFX T ti      k               [^kg]ti
SFX T ti      0               kti
SFX T gti     k               gti
SFX T ti      kime            [^kg]ti
SFX T ti      kim             [^kg]ti
SFX T ti      ime             kti
SFX T ti      im              kti
SFX T gti     kime            gti
SFX T gti     kim             gti
SFX T ti      kite            [^kg]ti
SFX T ti      kit             [^kg]ti
SFX T ti      ite             kti
SFX T ti      it              kti
SFX T gti     kite            gti
SFX T gti     kit             gti
SFX T ti      damas           ti
SFX T ti      dama            ti
SFX T ti      dami            ti
SFX T ti      damos           ti
SFX T i       as              ti
SFX T i       o               ti
SFX T i       am              ti
SFX T i       à               ti
SFX T i       u               ti
SFX T i       ame             ti
SFX T i       a               ti
SFX T i       os              ti
SFX T i       ai              ti
SFX T i       oje             ti
SFX T i       oj              ti
SFX T 0       ems             ti
SFX T i       us              ti
SFX T i       ais             ti
SFX T i       uose            ti
SFX T i       oms             ti
SFX T i       omis            ti
SFX T i       ose             ti
SFX T i       asis            ti
SFX T i       ojo             ti
SFX T i       ajam            ti
SFX T i       àjá             ti
SFX T i       uoju            ti
SFX T i       ajame           ti
SFX T i       oji             ti
SFX T i       osios           ti
SFX T i       ajai            ti
SFX T i       àjà             ti
SFX T i       àja             ti
SFX T i       ojoje           ti
SFX T i       ojoj            ti
SFX T 0       eji             ti
SFX T i       øjø             ti
SFX T 0       esiems          ti
SFX T i       uosius          ti
SFX T i       aisiais         ti
SFX T i       uosiuose        ti
SFX T i       osioms          ti
SFX T i       àsias           ti
SFX T i       osiomis         ti
SFX T i       osiose          ti
SFX T 0       nas             ti
SFX T 0       no              ti
SFX T 0       nam             ti
SFX T 0       nà              ti
SFX T 0       nu              ti
SFX T 0       name            ti
SFX T 0       na              ti
SFX T 0       nos             ti
SFX T 0       nai             ti
SFX T 0       noje            ti
SFX T 0       noj             ti
SFX T 0       ni              ti
SFX T 0       nø              ti
SFX T 0       niems           ti
SFX T 0       nus             ti
SFX T 0       nais            ti
SFX T 0       nuose           ti
SFX T 0       noms            ti
SFX T 0       nomis           ti
SFX T 0       nose            ti
SFX T ti      davus           ti
SFX T ti      davæs           ti
SFX T ti      davusio         ti
SFX T ti      davusiam        ti
SFX T ti      davusá          ti
SFX T ti      davusiu         ti
SFX T ti      davusiame       ti
SFX T ti      davusi          ti
SFX T ti      davusios        ti
SFX T ti      davusiai        ti
SFX T ti      davusià         ti
SFX T ti      davusia         ti
SFX T ti      davusioje       ti
SFX T ti      davusioj        ti
SFX T ti      davæ            ti
SFX T ti      davusiø         ti
SFX T ti      davusiems       ti
SFX T ti      davusius        ti
SFX T ti      davusiais       ti
SFX T ti      davusiuose      ti
SFX T ti      davusioms       ti
SFX T ti      davusias        ti
SFX T ti      davusiomis      ti
SFX T ti      davusiose       ti
SFX T ti      davusysis       ti
SFX T ti      davusiojo       ti
SFX T ti      davusiajam      ti
SFX T ti      davusájá        ti
SFX T ti      davusiuoju      ti
SFX T ti      davusiajame     ti
SFX T ti      davusioji       ti
SFX T ti      davusiosios     ti
SFX T ti      davusiajai      ti
SFX T ti      davusiàjà       ti
SFX T ti      davusiàja       ti
SFX T ti      davusiojoje     ti
SFX T ti      davusiojoj      ti
SFX T ti      davusieji       ti
SFX T ti      davusiøjø       ti
SFX T ti      davusiesiems    ti
SFX T ti      davusiuosius    ti
SFX T ti      davusiaisiais   ti
SFX T ti      davusiuosiuose  ti
SFX T ti      davusiosioms    ti
SFX T ti      davusiàsias     ti
SFX T ti      davusiosiomis   ti
SFX T ti      davusiosiose    ti
SFX T ti      siàs            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      siantis         [^szðþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèio         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiam        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      siantá          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiu         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiame       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      iàs             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      iantis          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèio          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiam         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      iantá           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiu          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiame        [sð]ti
SFX T zti     siàs            zti
SFX T zti     siantis         zti
SFX T zti     sianèio         zti
SFX T zti     sianèiam        zti
SFX T zti     siantá          zti
SFX T zti     sianèiu         zti
SFX T zti     sianèiame       zti
SFX T þti     ðiàs            þti
SFX T þti     ðiantis         þti
SFX T þti     ðianèio         þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiam        þti
SFX T þti     ðiantá          þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiu         þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiame       þti
SFX T ti      sianti          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèios        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiai        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèià         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèia         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèioje       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèioj        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ianti           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèios         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiai         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèià          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèia          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèioje        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèioj         [sð]ti
SFX T zti     sianti          zti
SFX T zti     sianèios        zti
SFX T zti     sianèiai        zti
SFX T zti     sianèià         zti
SFX T zti     sianèia         zti
SFX T zti     sianèioje       zti
SFX T zti     sianèioj        zti
SFX T þti     ðianti          þti
SFX T þti     ðianèios        þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiai        þti
SFX T þti     ðianèià         þti
SFX T þti     ðianèia         þti
SFX T þti     ðianèioje       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèioj        þti
SFX T ti      sià             [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      siantys         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiø         [^sðzþ]ti
