lib/dict/lt.dic
abuojëti/NTX
şagaruoti/NTX
aidëti/NTXbek
aitrinti/NTXacefhjv
aklëti/NTX
akuoti/NTXblv
alkinti/NTXdj
şalsvuoti/NTX
amerikonëti/NTX
şangstyti/NTWX
apağtalauti/NTX
aprobuoti/NTX
arenti/NTX
arpuoti/NRTXdp
asmenuoti/NTXdfv
ağtrinti/NRSTXcdeflprx
ğaudinëti/NTX
aukğtaièiuoti/NTX
automatëti/NTX
baigti/NRSTXacdefghjklmpqrsvwx
baladoti/NRSTXdfkopqw
bambinti/NTXl
barbinti/NTXk
bastelëti/NTX
bûbtelëti/NTX
bendrininkauti/NTX
bûgnuoti/NTX
bimbtelëti/NTX
birti/NTXcdefjkl
bjurti/NTXcdfk
bliaukti/NTXdk
blyğkinti/NTXdf
blûsèioti/NTX
bolğevikinti/NTX
brakonieriauti/NTX
brazdinti/NRTXegklo
brizginti/NTXd
brëştelëti/NTX
brûzti/NTX
bukti/NTXbejl
burkuoti/NTXklw
campinëti/NTX
cirkuliuoti/NTX
daiktinti/NTXck
darkyti/NRSTWXdekpqw
deformuoti/NRTX
denatûruoti/NTX
dşiaugti/NRSTXamnqrv
dingèioti/NTX
diskvalifikuoti/NTX
dëliauti/NTX
dramatinti/NTXk
dribèioti/NTX
dryksoti/NTX
drungninti/NTX
dulsti/NTXa
duşti/NTXcdehik
dvësioti/NTXd
áşeidinëti/NTX
şelioti/NTX
şergdinti/NTX
fanatizuoti/NRSTXk
gaguoti/NTX
galvoti/NRSTXadfhijkmoptvw
garsëti/NTXdef
gelsti/NTXadef
gişenti/NTX
girgştelëti/NTX
glaistyti/NRTWXaefhkltvwx
glitenti/RSTX
gnybèioti/NTX
graişyti/NTWXej
gretuoti/NTX
griozdinti/NRTXacefjklm
gërëti/NRSTXnr
gûştelëti/NTX
gunglinëti/NTX
gvieğti/NRSTXr
èiaurenti/NTX
ieğkinëti/NTX
ilgëti/NRSTXfip
imunizuoti/NTX
instruktuoti/NTX
iğpardavinëti/NTX
èirkğti/NTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
èişti/NTXcjk
èiulpëti/NTX
èiurlenti/NTX
şygiuoti/NRSTXabcdefghijknoquv
ëjinëti/NTX
justelëti/NTX
kaiğti/NTXde
kalviauti/NTX
kapstinëti/RSTX
karëti/NTX
kaukğëti/NTXk
keitinëti/NTX
kernoti/NTXdl
kiaurinti/NTX
kilti/NTXbdefkl
kirkinti/NRSTXfkl
kiunksoti/NTX
klaidinti/NTXfk
kledaruoti/NTX
klestelëti/NTX
kliokinti/NTX
klyksëti/NTX
klupti/NTXkl
knebti/NTXe
knirkti/NTXk
kolonizuoti/NTX
konstatuoti/NTX
kûprinti/NRSTXdfrw
krapinti/NTX
krekti/NTXk
kriûkuoti/NTX
krypinëti/NTX
kruvinti/NRTXdjkpw
kuksëti/NTX
kuokinëti/NTX
kusti/NTXbij
kvanktelëti/NTX
kvyksëti/NTX
laişinëti/NTX
lamdyti/NRSTWXadfijklmpuwx
ğlaptelëti/NTX
lebedyti/NTWX
ğlemğti/NTXjk
lesinëti/NTXfjk
liestelëti/NTX
linksniuoti/NTXd
şliugti/NTXcfjk
lizduoti/NRTX
lûkuriuoti/NTXd
şlugti/NRTXfjkv
ğmaikğtyti/NTWX
malinëti/NTX
marminti/NTXdj
maurëti/NTX
melioruoti/NTX
mielinti/NTX
mindyti/NRTWXadefjklpq
mirğti/NRTXfjlrvx
mûkti/NTXk
şmoninti/NTX
mudrinti/NTX
murmëti/NTXefik
nağlauti/NTXdfj
negaluoti/NTXk
neutralizuoti/NTX
ğnipinëti/NTXdfk
niurksoti/NTX
norti/NTXf
nusikalsti/NTX
ornamentuoti/NTX
paikioti/NTX
pakumpti/NTX
papèioti/NTX
pasimaivyti/NTWX
paukğtinëti/NTX
pelnauti/NTX
pigëti/NTX
pinigauti/NRTXfr
pypèioti/NTXk
plastenti/NTXk
plepëti/NRTXdefijkopruvx
plikuoti/NTX
pliurkğtelëti/NTX
èëploti/NRTXak
poğkinti/NTXk
prabilti/NTX
preparuoti/NTX
profiliuoti/NTX
pëstinti/NTX
puoselëti/NTXd
pusryèiauti/NTXfv
raişyti/NRSTWXabcdfijklmopqruvwx
ramstinëti/NRSTXfr
raulioti/NTX
reikalauti/NTXdfp
resvëti/NTX
ridëti/RSTX
rioglinëti/NTX
rëkaloti/NTX
ræsti/NRTXceklw
rusinti/NRSTXk
saldşiaşodşiauti/NTX
sarmatyti/NRSTWXkw
sekinti/NTXd
siaurëti/NTXefk
silpninti/NTXek
siurbsnoti/NTX
skalsëti/NTXf
skeldinti/NTX
skyrinëti/NTX
skrabinti/NTX
skëtrioti/NRTXk
slavëti/NTXk
slyvauti/NTX
smaugti/NRSTXcefhjkloqrtvwx
sàmojauti/NTX
snopinëti/NTX
spauduoti/NRTXcko
spirti/NRSTXbcdefhjklnopqrwx
sprengti/NTXl
spurinti/NTX
stabarëti/NTXk
stebti/NTXe
stiprinti/NRSTXcfkor
stokoti/NTX
striukinti/NTXfk
sublimuoti/RSTX
sukvailti/NTX
suprieğingëti/NTX
suşvangti/NTX
svetimëti/NTXk
tağinëti/NTX
tamprëti/NTXf
tarkğti/NTXkl
tebesijuokti/T
telşti/NTXfj
şûti/NTUXik
tinginiauti/NTXfi
tirvinti/NTX
topsoti/NTX
trandyti/NTWXk
treliuoti/NTX
trikdyti/NRSTWXfkw
triuğkëti/NTXk
trokğti/NTXdejkl
tûşti/NTXchov
turğti/NTX
tverinëti/NTX
tvoksti/RSTX
unkğèioti/NTX
urğti/RSTX
ğvagşdinti/NTX
vaisiuoti/RSTX
valgydinti/NTXfjkl
vandenyti/NTWXf
varginti/NRSTXcdefhjklqrtv
ğvartuoti/RSTX
vedinëti/NTXbcdefhjklnopqstvx
ğvelpti/NTX
verpdinti/NTX
şviegti/NTXfklqvwx
vikstelëti/NTX
şviluoti/NTX
virduliuoti/NTX
virti/ENRSTXabdefhijklpruvx
şvygèioti/NTX
vytuoti/NTX
volioti/NRSTXadfjkprvw
zaugti/NTX
zonduoti/NTX
